Washington statutes.
RCW 19.320.030

Personal jurisdiction.

For purposes of establishing personal jurisdiction under this chapter, an international labor recruitment agency or a domestic employer of a foreign worker is deemed to be doing business in Washington and is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of Washington state if the agency or employer contracts for employment services with a Washington resident or is considered to be doing business under any other provision or rule of law.

[ 2009 c 492 s 3.]